District of Columbia statutes.
34-2105

Repealed

Sanitary sewer service charge.

Repealed.

Oct. 21, 1975, D.C. Law 1-23, title VII, § 701(b), 22 DCR 2115
June 15, 1976, D.C. Law 1-70, title VI, § 602, 23 DCR 549
Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-134, § 3, 27 DCR 4424
June 4, 1982, D.C. Law 4-112, § 4, 29 DCR 1687
June 22, 1983, D.C. Law 5-14, § 1003, 30 DCR 2632
Oct. 1, 1987, D.C. Law 7-26, § 3, 34 DCR 5074
Oct. 18, 1989, D.C. Law 8-38, § 3, 36 DCR 5752
repealed pursuant to § 305 of D.C. Law 11-111
1981 Ed., § 43-1605.
1973 Ed., § 43-1605a.
Repeal effective 90 days after meeting of Board: Section 305 of D.C. Law 11-111 repealed this section. However, § 601 of D.C. Law 11-111 provided that title III of the act shall apply 90 days after the initial meeting of the Board established by section 204 of the act.